Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1248
Enforcement provisions; terms, defined.

In sections 43-1248 to 43-1264:

(1) Petitioner means a person who seeks enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

(2) Respondent means a person against whom a proceeding has been commenced for enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 23.